District of Columbia statutes.
10-118

Beach Parkway — Dedication and conveyances of exchanged land.

The dedication and transfers provided for in § 10-117 hereof are designated approximately upon plat file numbered 3.9-97 in the files of the National Capital Planning Commission. The dedication and conveyances shall be by proper deed and other instruments containing full legal description by exact survey of the land exchanged and dedicated as provided for by law.

Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 881, ch. 741, § 2
1981 Ed., § 8-118.
1973 Ed., § 8-122.
The functions, powers and duties of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission were transferred to the National Capital Planning Commission by the Act of June 6, 1924, 43 Stat. 463, ch. 270, § 9, as added by the Act of July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 790, ch. 949, § 1.